Hawaii statutes.
§635-32 Segregation during trial. It
shall not be necessary in any case for any trial jury after having been finally
accepted and sworn to try the cause, to be segregated, locked up, or otherwise
confined at any time prior to retiring to deliberate upon their verdict;
provided that the court may in its discretion order and direct that the trial
jury in any case shall be segregated, locked up, or otherwise confined after
being finally accepted and sworn to try the cause and until a verdict is
arrived at or the jury discharged. [L 1905, c 75, §1; RL 1925, §2424; RL 1935,
§3740; RL 1945, §10116; RL 1955, §231-16; HRS §635-32; am L 1972, c 89, §2B(1)]

Case Notes

In case not capital, discretion of court to segregate jurors
during trial. 9 H. 522 (1894).

Failure to segregate in capital case (now life imprisonment)
not error. 30 H. 697 (1929).

Separation of jury and use of liquor, not prejudicial as
matter of law. 45 H. 457, 370 P.2d 468 (1962).

Review of nonevidentiary table posted in courtroom by juror
coming out of jury room during deliberations. 49 H. 116, 121-126, 412 P.2d 662
(1966).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next